src/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverb inflection
!! --------------------
!! Ingrian adjectives compare.

LEXICON AdvTag
+Adv:0      K   ;

LEXICON AdvManner
+Adv+Manner:0      K   ;

LEXICON AdvSpat
+Adv+Spat:0      K   ;

LEXICON AdvSpat-Prl
+Adv+Spat+Prl:0      K   ;

LEXICON AdvTemp
+Adv+Temp:0        K   ;

LEXICON AdvTemp-Ess
+Adv+Temp+Ess:0        K   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
